Wisconsin, session 2025, SB1044.
do enact as follows:SB1044,11Section 1. 252.04 (1) of the statutes is amended to read:SB1044,2,132252.04 (1) The department shall carry out a statewide immunization program 3to eliminate mumps, measles, rubella (German measles), diphtheria, pertussis 4(whooping cough), poliomyelitis and other diseases that the department specifies by 5rule, and to protect against tetanus. The department shall, in considering diseases 6for elimination to be included in the vaccination schedule as provided under this 7section, take into account the recommendations, if any, of the American Academy of 8Pediatrics or American Academy of Family Physicians. Any person who immunizes 9an individual under this section shall maintain records identifying the 10manufacturer and lot number of the vaccine used, the date of immunization and the 11name and title of the person who immunized the individual. These records shall be 12available to the individual or, if the individual is a minor, to his or her parent, 13guardian or legal custodian upon request.SB1044,214Section 2. 609.88 (title) of the statutes is amended to read:SB1044,2,1515609.88 (title) Coverage of immunizations for dependents.SB1044,316Section 3. 609.883 of the statutes is created to read:SB1044,2,1817609.883 Coverage of vaccines. Defined network plans, preferred provider 18plans, and limited service health organizations are subject to s. 632.895 (14c).SB1044,419Section 4. 632.895 (14) (title) of the statutes is amended to read:SB1044,2,2020632.895 (14) (title) Coverage of immunizations for dependents.SB1044,521Section 5. 632.895 (14) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:SB1044,3,422632.895 (14) (b) Except Subject to sub. (14c) and except as provided in par. (d), 1every disability insurance policy, and every self-insured health plan of the state or a 2county, city, town, village or school district, that provides coverage for a dependent 3of the insured shall provide coverage of appropriate and necessary immunizations, 4from birth to the age of 6 years, for a dependent who is a child of the insured.SB1044,65Section 6. 632.895 (14c) of the statutes is created to read:SB1044,3,126632.895 (14c) Coverage of vaccines. Every disability insurance policy, and 7every self-insured health plan of the state or of a county, city, town, village, or school 8district, that provides coverage for a vaccine according to the recommendations of 9the U.S. centers for disease control and prevention shall, if the federal government 10withdraws the recommendations, continue to provide coverage, on an equal basis, 11for the vaccine according to the recommendations, if any, of the American Academy 12of Pediatrics or American Academy of Family Physicians.SB1044,3,1313